Utah, session 2026, SB2.
Section 1. Section 53E-1-201 is amended to read:53E-1-201Effective 07/01/26Partially Repealed 07/01/27. Reports to and action required of the Education Interim Committee.(1)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following recurring reports are due to the Education Interim Committee:(a)the report described in Section 9-22-109 by the STEM Action Center Board, including the information described in Section 9-22-113 on the status of the computer science initiative and Section 9-22-114 on the Computing Partnerships Grants Program;(b)the prioritized list of data research described in Section 53H-15-303 and the report on research and activities described in Section 53H-15-305 by the Utah Data Research Center;(c)the report described in Section 53H-1-203 by the Utah Board of Higher Education on career and technical education issues and addressing workforce needs;(d)the annual report of the Utah Board of Higher Education described in Section 53H-1-203;(e)the reports described in Section 53H-7-603 by the Utah Board of Higher Education regarding activities related to campus safety;(f)the State Superintendent's Annual Report by the state board described in Section 53E-1-203;(g)the annual report described in Section 53E-2-202 by the state board on the strategic plan to improve student outcomes;(h)the report described in Section 53E-3-501 by the state board on students in an LEA who receive academic credit through the packet method;(i)the report described in Section 53E-8-204 by the state board on the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind;(j)the report described in Section 53E-10-703 by the Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education director on research and other activities;(k)the report described in Section 53F-2-522 regarding mental health screening programs;(l)the report described in Section 53F-4-203 by the state board and the independent evaluator on an evaluation of early interactive reading software;(m)the report described in Section 53F-6-412 by the program manager of the Utah Fits All Scholarship Program;(n)the report described in Section 63N-20-107 by the Governor's Office of Economic Opportunity on UPSTART;(o)the report described in Section 53F-5-215 by the state board related to a grant for an elementary teacher preparation assessment;(p)upon request, the report described in Section 53F-5-219 by the state board on the Local Innovations Civics Education Pilot Program;(q)the report described in Section 53F-5-405 by the state board regarding an evaluation of a partnership that receives a grant to improve educational outcomes for students who are low-income;(r)the report described in Section 53H-1-604 regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council;(s)the report described in Section 53G-7-221 by the state board regarding innovation plans; and(t)the reports described in Section 53F-6-412 regarding the Utah Fits All Scholarship Program.(2)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following occasional reports are due to the Education Interim Committee:(a)in 2027, 2030, 2033, and 2035, the reports described in Sections 53H-1-502, 53H-1-503, and 53H-1-504;(b)in 2025, the report described in Section 53H-6-203 by a degree-granting institution regarding policies on abusive coaching practices;(c)if required, the report described in Section 53E-4-309 by the state board explaining the reasons for changing the grade level specification for the administration of specific assessments;(d)if required, the report described in Section 53E-5-210 by the state board of an adjustment to the minimum level that demonstrates proficiency for each statewide assessment;(e)the report described in Section 53E-10-702 by Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education;(f)if required, the report described in Section 53F-2-513 by the state board evaluating the effects of salary bonuses on the recruitment and retention of effective teachers in high-poverty schools;(g)upon request, the report described in Section 53F-10-303 by the state board regarding the Rural School Sports Facilities Grant Program;(h)upon request, a report described in Section 53G-7-222 by an LEA regarding expenditure of a percentage of state restricted funds to support an innovative education program;(i)the reports described in Section 53G-11-304 by the state board regarding proposed rules and results related to educator exit surveys; and(j)the report described in Section 26B-5-113 by the Office of Substance Use and Mental Health, the state board, and the Department of Health and Human Services regarding recommendations related to Medicaid reimbursement for school-based health services.(3)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, every five years the Education Interim Committee shall review the programs described in the following sections of code:(a)beginning July 1, 2027, Title 53E, Chapter 10, Part 3, Concurrent Enrollment;(b)beginning July 1, 2027, Section 53F-2-408, Enhancement for Accelerated Students Program;(c)beginning July 1, 2027, Section 53F-2-409, Concurrent enrollment funding;(d)beginning July 1, 2027, Section 53F-2-415, Student health and counseling support -- Qualifying personnel -- Distribution formula -- Rulemaking;(e)beginning July 1, 2028, Section 53F-2-416, Appropriation and distribution for the Teacher and Student Success Program;(f)beginning July 1, 2028, Section 53F-2-510, Digital Teaching and Learning Grant Program;(g)(f)beginning July 1, 2028, Section 53F-9-306, Teacher and Student Success Account;(h)(g)beginning July 1, 2028, Title 53G, Chapter 7, Part 13, Teacher and Student Success Program; and(i)(h)beginning July 1, 2029, Section 53F-2-502, Dual language immersion.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53E-1-202 is amended to read:53E-1-202Effective 07/01/26. Reports to and action required of the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee.(1)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following recurring reports are due to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee:(a)the State Superintendent's Annual Report by the state board described in Section 53E-1-203;(b)the state superintendent's required report described in Subsection 63J-1-206(3)(b) related to transferring money appropriated to the Minimum School Program for fiscal years 2027 and 2028;(c)the report described in Section 53E-8-204 by the state board regarding student personnel and data standards for the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind;(b)(d)the report described in Section 53E-10-703 by the Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education director on research and other activities; and(c)(e)the report by the STEM Action Center Board described in Section 9-22-109, including the information described in Section 9-22-113 on the status of the computer science initiative.(2)In accordance with applicable provisions, the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee shall complete,  if required, the study described in Section 53F-4-304 of scholarship payments.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53E-3-1004 is amended to read:53E-3-1004Effective 07/01/26. Community engagement for early literacy.(1)As used in this section, "Title I school" means a school that receives funds under Title I of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.(1)(2)The state board shall:(a)partner with a private business or nonprofit organization to annually provide personal, home-use, age-appropriate printed books or digital books with accompanying electronic reading devices to students:(i)who attend:(A)a school that participates in partnerships that receive grants under Title 53F, Chapter 5, Part 4, Partnerships for Student Success Grant Program; or(B)a Title I school, as that term is defined in Section 53F-2-523; and(ii)at a minimum, in kindergarten through grade 3; and(b)provide students a choice of language where possible.(2)(3)The state board shall develop and promote a website that provides resources for teachers and other educational support personnel to support targeted activities and strategies for parents to support at-home reading.(3)(4)The state board shall contract with one or more organizations that have expertise in coordinating community resources to:(a)provide training and coaching to community, school, and parent engagement coordinators; and(b)for a school that is not participating in a partnership that receives a grant under Title 53F, Chapter 5, Part 4, Partnerships for Student Success Grant Program:(i)assess the presence of existing community school infrastructure; and(ii)provide necessary supports for parent, community, and business engagement, including services and coordination support.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53E-8-207 is enacted to read:53E-8-207Effective 07/01/26. Student count -- Data -- Reporting.(1)The state board shall establish student and personnel data standards for the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind that:(a)provide for comparability of data with similar data elements in the public education system; and(b)support accurate and timely reporting.(2)In establishing the data standards described in Subsection (1), the state board shall:(a)adopt a centralized data management system for the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind with appropriate system controls and automated data management strategies where practicable;(b)coordinate with the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind to reconcile data sources; and(c)require the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind to identify benchmarks and report relevant comparisons of assessment data in the annual report described in Subsection 53E-8-204(5).(3)On or before August 15, 2026, the state board shall report to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee on the implementation of Subsection (1).

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 53F-2-311 is amended to read:53F-2-311Effective 07/01/26. Weighted pupil units for career and technical education programs -- Funding of approved programs -- Performance measures -- Qualifying criteria.(1)(a)Money appropriated to the state board for approved career and technical education programs and the comprehensive guidance program:(i)shall be allocated to eligible recipients as provided in Subsections (2), (3), and (4); and(ii)may not be used to fund programs below grade 9.(b)Subsection (1)(a)(ii) does not apply to the following programs:work-based learning programs.(i)comprehensive guidance; and(ii)work-based learning programs.(2)(a)Weighted pupil units are computed for pupils in approved programs.(b)(i)The state board shall fund approved programs based upon hours of membership of grades 9 through 12 students.(ii)Subsection (2)(b)(i) does not apply to the following programs:(A)comprehensive guidance; and(B)work-based learning programs.work-based learning programs.(c)The state board shall use an amount not to exceed 20% of the total appropriation under this section to fund approved programs based on performance measures such as placement and competency attainment defined in standards set by the state board.(d)The state board shall make the necessary calculations for distribution of the appropriation to a school district and charter school and may revise and recommend changes necessary for achieving equity and ease of administration.(3)(a)Twenty weighted pupil units shall be computed for career and technical education administrative costs for each school district, except 25 weighted pupil units may be computed for each school district that consolidates career and technical education administrative services with one or more other school districts.(b)Between 10 and 25 weighted pupil units shall be computed for each high school conducting approved career and technical education programs in a school district according to standards established by the state board.(c)Forty weighted pupil units shall be computed for each school district that operates an approved career and technical education center.(d)Between five and seven weighted pupil units shall be computed for each summer career and technical education agriculture program according to standards established by the state board.(e)The state board shall, by rule, establish qualifying criteria for a school district or charter school to receive weighted pupil units under this Subsection (3).(4)(a)Money remaining after the allocations made under Subsections (2) and (3) shall be allocated using average daily membership in approved programs for the previous year.(b)A school district or charter school that has experienced student growth in grades 9 through 12 for the previous year shall have the growth factor applied to the previous year's weighted pupil units when calculating the allocation of money under this Subsection (4).(c)An LEA may use funds received through the general allocation described in this Subsection (4) for Technology-Life-Careers and student leadership organizations.(5)(a)The state board shall establish rules for upgrading high school career and technical education programs.(b)The rules shall reflect career and technical training and actual marketable job skills in society.(c)The rules shall include procedures to assist school districts and charter schools to convert existing programs that are not preparing students for the job market into programs that will accomplish that purpose.(6)Programs that do not meet state board standards may not be funded under this section.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 53F-2-317 is enacted to read:53F-2-317Effective 07/01/26. Weighted pupil units for college and career counseling.(1)(a)Subject to legislative appropriations, the state board shall distribute WPUs to a qualifying LEA in accordance with this section.(b)An LEA that meets the requirements of Subsection (3) may receive a distribution of WPUs as follows:(i)a base number of WPUs for the first 400 students enrolled in the LEA, as the state board determines; and(ii)a per-student WPU allocation, as the state board determines, for each additional student enrolled in the LEA beyond 400 students, up to 1,200 students.(2)The state board shall:(a)use the October 1 enrollment count from the previous fiscal year to determine the number of students for purposes of calculating a distribution under this section;(b)annually adjust the number of WPUs the state board distributes under this section in proportion to the percentage increase or decrease in total statewide student enrollment; and(c)increase or decrease the total WPUs available under this section each fiscal year based on the percentage increase or decrease in total statewide enrollment that the state board determines using October 1 enrollment data from the previous fiscal year.(3)To qualify for a distribution under this section, an LEA shall:(a)have a plan for college and career readiness consistent with Section 53F-2-311;(b)have an approved student success framework described in Section 53G-7-1304;(c)maintain a school counselor-to-student ratio the state board determines; and(d)meet any additional requirements the state board establishes in rule.(4)An LEA that receives a WPU under this section shall use the funds to support college and career counseling and readiness services.(5)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the state board shall make rules to:(a)determine the base number of WPUs and per-student WPU allocation described in Subsection (1);(b)establish procedures for calculating and distributing WPUs under this section; and(c)define additional qualifying criteria consistent with this section.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 53F-2-405 is amended to read:53F-2-405Effective 07/01/26. Educator salary adjustments.(1)As used in this section, "educator" means a person employed by a school district, charter school, regional education service agency, or the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind who holds:(a)(i)a license issued by the state board; and(ii)a position as a:(A)classroom teacher;(B)speech pathologist;(C)librarian or media specialist;(D)preschool teacher;(E)mentor teacher;(F)teacher specialist or teacher leader;(G)guidance counselor;(H)audiologist;(I)psychologist; or(J)social worker; or(b)(i)a license issued by the Division of Professional Licensing; and(ii)a position as a social worker.(2)In recognition of the need to attract and retain highly skilled and dedicated educators, the Legislature shall annually appropriate money for educator salary adjustments, subject to future budget constraints.(3)(a)The state board shall distribute to each school district, each charter school, each regional education service agency, and the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind money that the Legislature appropriates for educator salary adjustments based on the number of educator positions described in Subsection (1) in the school district, the charter school, each regional education service agency, or the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(b)Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), if appropriations are insufficient to provide the full amount of educator salary adjustments described in this section, the state board shall distribute money appropriated for educator salary adjustments to school districts, charter schools, each regional education service agency, and the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind in proportion to the number of full-time-equivalent educator positions in a school district, a charter school, each regional education service agency, or the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind as compared to the total number of full-time-equivalent educator positions in school districts, charter schools, each regional education service agency, and the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.(4)A school district, a charter school, each regional education service agency, or the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind shall award bonuses to educators as follows:(a)for fiscal year 2026, the amount of the salary adjustment for each full-time-equivalent educator is:(i)if Chapter 6, Part 4, Utah Fits All Scholarship Program, is funded and in effect, $10,350; or(ii)if Chapter 6, Part 4, Utah Fits All Scholarship Program, is not funded and in effect, $5,175;(b)an individual who is not a full-time educator shall receive a partial salary adjustment based on the number of hours the individual works as an educator;(c)a salary adjustment may not be awarded if an educator has received an unsatisfactory rating on the educator's three most recent evaluations; and(d)for a fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2024, the amount of the salary adjustment is equal to:(i)the amount of salary adjustment in the preceding fiscal year; and(ii)a percentage increase that is equal to the percentage increase in the for the lesser of the:(A)value of the WPU in the preceding fiscal year.; or(B)the percent change in the value of the Consumer Price Index in the preceding fiscal year compared to the current fiscal year.(5)In  accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the state board:(a)shall make rules to ensure that the LEAs do not:(i)reduce or supplant a compensation increase from an increase in the WPU value with an increase from the salary supplement in this section; or(ii)reduce or artificially limit a teacher's salary to convert the salary supplement in this section into a windfall to the LEA; and(b)may make rules as necessary to administer this section.(6)(a)Subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature shall appropriate sufficient money each year to:(i)maintain educator salary adjustments provided in prior years; and(ii)provide educator salary adjustments to new employees.(b)Money appropriated for educator salary adjustments shall include money for the following employer-paid benefits:(i)retirement;(ii)worker's compensation;(iii)social security; and(iv)Medicare.(7)(a)Subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature shall:(i)maintain the salary adjustments provided to school administrators in the 2007-08 school year; and(ii)provide salary adjustments for new school administrators in the same amount as provided for existing school administrators.(b)The appropriation provided for educator salary adjustments described in this section shall include salary adjustments for school administrators as specified in Subsection (7)(a).(c)In distributing and awarding salary adjustments for school administrators, the state board, a school district, a charter school, each regional education service agency, or the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind shall comply with the requirements for the distribution and award of educator salary adjustments as provided in Subsections (3) and (4).

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 53F-2-522 is amended to read:53F-2-522Effective 07/01/26. Public education mental health screening.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Division" means the Division of Integrated Healthcare within the Department of Health and Human Services.(b)"Non-participating LEA" means an LEA that does not administer an approved mental health screening program described in this section.(c)"Participating LEA" means an LEA that has an approved screening program described in this section.(d)"Participating student" means a student in a participating LEA who participates in a mental health screening program.(e)"Qualifying parent" means a parent:(i)of a participating student who, based on the results of a screening program, would benefit from resources that cannot be provided to the participating student in the school setting; and(ii)who qualifies for financial assistance to pay for the resources under rules made by the state board.(f)"Screening program" means a student mental health screening program selected by a participating LEA and approved by the state board in consultation with the division.(2)(a)On or before July 1, 2023, an LEA governing board shall determine whether the LEA will be a participating LEA or a non-participating LEA for the 2023-24 school year.(b)(i)During the 2023-24 school year, and each year after, a participating LEA may change the LEA's participation status and become a non-participating LEA for the next school year by reporting the status change to the state board on or before August 1, 2024.(ii)An LEA that changed the LEA's status from participating to non-participating in Subsection (2)(b)(i) is subject to the requirements of a non-participating LEA described in Subsection (2)(c).(c)(i)During the 2023-24 school year, and each year after, a non-participating LEA's governing board shall submit a record of determination to the state board on or before August 1 of each year, which record shall state whether the non-participating LEA will:(A)maintain the LEA's non-participating status; or(B)change the LEA's status to be a participating LEA.(ii)If the non-participating LEA determines the LEA will change participation status and become a participating LEA, the LEA's status of participation will change at the end of the current school year.(d)If an LEA governing board failed to make the determination required in Subsection (2)(a) on or before July 1, 2023, the LEA governing board shall determine whether the LEA will be a participating LEA for the 2024-25 school year and notify the state board of the determination on or before August 1, 2024.(3)The state board shall:(a)make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:(i)establish a process for a participating LEA to submit a selected screening program to the state board for approval;(ii)in accordance with Title 53E, Chapter 9, Student Privacy and Data Protection, and the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g, establish who may access and use a participating student's screening data;(iii)establish a requirement and a process for appropriate LEA or school personnel to attend annual training related to administering the screening program;(iv)determine whether a parent is eligible to receive the financial support described in Subsection (5)(a) as a qualifying parent; and(v)apply for and distribute the financial support described in Subsection (5)(a);(b)in consultation with the division, approve an evidence-based student mental health screening program selected by a participating LEA that:(i)is age appropriate for each grade in which the screening program is administered;(ii)screens for the mental health conditions determined by the state board and division; and(iii)is an effective tool for identifying whether a student has a mental health condition that requires intervention; and(c)on or before August 30 of each year, submit a report on the screening programs tothe StateStatewide Suicide Prevention Committee created under Section 26B-5-611 and the Education Interim Committee in accordance with Section 53E-1-201 that contains the following:(i)the approximate number of participating students that were screened in each participating LEA the previous school year;(ii)the approximate number of participating students referred to additional services or for whom intervention was required;(iii)the names and number of:(A)participating LEAs; (B)non-participating LEAs; and(C)LEAs that failed to make and report to the state board the determination to be participating or non-participating LEAs;(iv)information regarding:(A)reasons why an LEA failed to make a determination to be a participating or non-participating LEA; and(B)any LEA that determined to be a participating LEA but failed to implement a mental health screening program;(v)an overview of how participating LEAs utilized distributed funds; and(vi)whether the amount of distributed funds to each participating LEA was sufficient for the participating LEA's needs.(4)A participating LEA shall:(a)in accordance with rules made by the state board under Subsection (3)(a), submit a selected evidence-based screening program to the state board for approval;(b)implement and administer a state board-approved mental health screening program to participating students in the participating LEA by:(i)annually notifying each parent with a student in the participating LEA that the parent may have the student screened for mental health conditions;(ii)obtaining prior written consent from a student's parent, that complies with Section 53E-9-203, and the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g, before the participating LEA screens a participating student;(iii)screening the student for mental health conditions; and(iv)if results of a participating student's screening indicate a potential mental health condition, notifying the parent of the participating student of:(A)the participating student's results; and(B)resources available to the participating student, including any services that can be provided by the school mental health provider or by a partnering entity;(c)use state board-distributed funds for the purposes described in Subsection (5)(a); and(d)provide the state board with necessary information and data for the state board to complete the report described in Subsection (3)(c).(5)(a)Within appropriations made by the Legislature for this purpose, the state board may distribute funds to a participating LEA to use to:(i)implement and administer a mental health screening for participating students as described in Subsection (4)(b); and(ii)assist a qualifying parent to pay for resources described in Subsection (4)(b)(iv)(B) that cannot be provided by a school mental health professional in the school setting.(b)To distribute funds as described in Subsection (5)(a), the state board shall:(i)distribute 90% of the available funds to participating LEAs based on the previous year's average daily membership count; and(ii)distribute the remaining 10% of the available funds on an as-needed basis to participating LEAs if the LEA has exhausted the funds distributed under Subsection (5)(b)(i) and has additional need.(b)The state board shall distribute the funds described in Subsection (5)(a) on an as-needed basis to a participating LEA.(c)The state board may not distribute funds described in Subsection (5)(a) to a non-participating LEA.(6)A school employee trained in accordance with rules made by the state board under Subsection (3)(a)(iii), who administers an approved mental health screening in accordance with this section in good faith, is not liable in a civil action for an act taken or not taken under this section.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 53F-6-501 is amended to read:53F-6-501Effective 07/01/26. Utah Private Course Choice Empowerment program.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Authorized online course provider" or "provider" means a provider approved by the program manager to offer online courses through the program.(b)"Blended learning" means an education model that:(i)combines in-person and online or digital instruction and learning activities;(ii)allows students to receive instruction through:(A)direct, in-person interaction with an instructor;(B)digital or online content and activities; or(C)a combination of both in-person and online methods;(iii)may include hybrid teaching formats where:(A)some students participate in-person while others participate remotely; or(B)instruction alternates between in-person and online delivery; and(iv)provides students flexibility in time, place, path, or pace of learning.(c)"Contract administrator" means the state board's appointed Deputy Superintendent of Operationsdeputy superintendent of operations that ensures the program manager meets contractual obligations.(d)"Contract oversight and compliance" means the oversight and coordination functions performed by the Department of Operations contract administrator, including:(i)establishing and maintaining program standards within a contract with a program manager;(ii)determining operational requirements and structures;(iii)procuring and managing contracts for program services and standards;(iv)ensuring program integrity through direct or contracted oversight;(v)coordinating program functions and contracted services with a program manager; and(vi)maintaining appropriate separation between government oversight and independent program operations.(e)"Contracted entity" means an organization that:(i)contracts with the state board to perform duties and functions necessary for program administration and operations;(ii)is not affiliated with any international organization;(iii)does not harvest data for the purpose of reproducing or distributing the data to other entities;(iv)has no involvement in guiding or directing any curriculum or curriculum standards; and(v)performs the specific duties and functions assigned in the contract with the state board.(f)"Department of Operations" means the section of the state board that oversees financial operations, procurement operations, data and statistics operations, school land trust, and information technology operations for the state board.(g)"Eligible student" means a student:(i)who attends a private school whose parent is a resident of Utah; or(ii)who is an exchange student residing in Utah and enrolled in a private school in Utah.(h)"Online course" means a course of instruction for grades 6 through 12 offered through the program using digital technology, including:(i)an exclusively online learning and instructional model; or(ii)blended learning models.(i)"Private school" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53F-6-401.(j)"Program" means the Utah Private Course Choice Empowerment program created in this section.(k)"Program manager" means a contracted entity that, at the time of application, demonstrates the ability without external contracts to internally meet the qualifications specified in this section, that is contracted by the state board to administer the Utah Private Course Choice Empowerment program, including:(i)the ability to manage, distribute, and transact program funds;(ii)capacity to create and maintain a user-friendly website;(iii)the ability to verify a student's eligibility based on the requirements of this part;(iv)capacity to process provider payments and maintain financial records;(v)ability to track, monitor, and report program enrollment, participation, and outcomes at both provider and individual student levels; and(vi)maintenance of a publicly accessible provider list, including:(A)the capability to allow a student or a student's parent to rate, review, and share information about providers; and(B)appropriate links to a provider's course catalog.(2)The program is created to enable an eligible student to engage in taking online courses.(3)The purposes of the program are to:(a)provide a student with access to online learning options regardless of where the student attends school, including blended learning settings;(b)provide digital learning options for a student regardless of language, residence, family income, or special needs;(c)utilize the power and scalability of technology to customize education so that a student may learn in the student's own style preference and at the student's own pace;(d)provide greater access to self-paced programs enabling a high achieving student to accelerate academically, while a struggling student may have additional time and help to gain competency;(e)allow a student to customize the student's schedule to better meet the student's academic goals;(f)provide quality learning options to better prepare a student for post-secondary education and career opportunities; and(g)support flexible learning environments through blended learning options that combine the benefits of both in-person and online instruction to enhance student engagement and achievement.(4)An eligible student may enroll in an online course offered through the program if:(a)the student meets the course prerequisites; and(b)the course is open for enrollment.(5)(a)An eligible student may enroll in online courses up to the equivalent of six credits per school year.(b)Notwithstanding Subsection (5)(a), if an eligible student is also a scholarship student as defined in Section 53F-6-401, the student may enroll in online courses up to the equivalent of four credits per school year.(c)Beginning July 1, 2027, an eligible student participating in the program that is a scholarship student, as that term is defined in Section 53F-6-401, shall use scholarship funds, as that term is defined in Section 53F-6-401, to participate in the program.(6)(a)No later than April 1, 2025, the state board shall:(i)in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, enter in an agreement with one or more contracted entities to serve as a program manager for the program, including management of the funds appropriated for the program;(ii)ensure the initial contract is no more than a three-year contract with annual renewal options subject to performance review and compliance with Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code; and(iii)ensure the contract:(A)clearly delineates the specific duties and functions to be performed;(B)ensures the efficiency and success of the program;(C)maintains appropriate separation between program and contract administration and direct educational services;(D)preserves the independence of educational decisions made between parents and providers; and(E)does not impose any requirements on the program manager that are not essential to the basic administration of the program or create restrictions, directions, or mandates regarding instructional content or curriculum.(b)The state board shall perform contract oversight and compliance through the contract administrator, who shall: (i)regulate and take enforcement action as necessary against a program manager in accordance with the provisions of the state board's agreement with the program manager;(ii)ensure the program manager adheres to all contractual obligations;(iii)review all program reports and financial records;(iv)conduct regular compliance audits; and(v)evaluate the program manager's performance annually.(c)The state board shall not include a provision in any rule that creates or implies a restriction, direction, or mandate regarding program administration, including student enrollment, payments to providers, instructional content, or curriculum.(d)The state board, in collaboration with the contract administrator, may:(i)distribute program functions among multiple contracted entities, including:(A)program management functions;(B)financial processing and payment functions;(C)provider management functions; and(D)other administrative functions as needed; and(ii)ensure appropriate coordination between all contracted entities through clearly defined roles and responsibilities in each contract.(7)(a)The program manager shall:(i)administer the program;(ii)ensure an eligible student can navigate to all authorized online course providers' enrollment platforms or tools for the program;(iii)approve and oversee authorized online course providers;(iv)establish guidelines for qualifying providers and courses;(v)manage funds appropriated for the program;(vi)make payments to authorized online course providers that may not include transaction fees of any kind;(vii)as described in Subsection (19), provide an annual report on the performance of the program to the Education Interim Committee; and(viii)ensure compliance with applicable laws and regulations.(b)The program manager shall maintain detailed financial records subject to review by the contract administrator, including:(i)all course payments processed;(ii)provider payment histories;(iii)administrative costs; and(iv)audit results.(8)The state board may regulate and take enforcement action as necessary against a program manager in accordance with the provisions of the state board's agreement with the program manager.(9)(a)If the state board determines that a program manager has violated a provision of this part or a provision of the state board's agreement with the program manager, the state board shall send written notice to the program manager explaining the violation and the remedial action required to correct the violation.(b)A program manager that receives a notice described in Subsection (9)(a) shall, no later than 60 days after the day on which the program manager receives the notice, correct the violation and report the correction to the state board.(c)(i)If a program manager that receives a notice described in Subsection (9)(a) fails to correct a violation in the time period described in Subsection (9)(b), the state board may bar the program manager from further participation in the program.(ii)A program manager may appeal a decision of the state board under Subsection (9)(c)(i) in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.(d)A program manager may not accept state funds while the program manager:(i)is barred from participating in the program under Subsection (9)(c)(i); or(ii)has an appeal pending under Subsection (9)(c)(ii).(e)A program manager that has an appeal pending under Subsection (9)(c)(ii) may continue to administer online courses during the pending appeal.(10)The program manager shall approve online course providers to offer courses through the program.(11)(a)Subject to Subsection (11)(b), the program manager shall establish a process to approve an entity as an authorized online course provider, including:(i)the entity's demonstration of at least three years of experience in either:(A)developing and delivering proprietary digital coursework for students; or(B)successfully aggregating and managing third-party digital education providers and courses for students;(ii)the ability to provide a publicly available user-friendly website for an eligible student, including:(A)an accessible course enrollment system;(B)comprehensive provider and course information; and(C)program participation metrics;(iii)verification that within the past five years, the entity:(A)has not been subject to sanctions;(B)has not undergone investigations;(C)has not had adverse findings in malfeasance audits; and(D)has not received other official censures in any state where it delivers digital courses;(iv)certification that the entity is not currently named in any lawsuit or ongoing civil litigation in any state where the entity delivers digital courses; and(v)the entity's demonstrated capacity to:(A)evaluate and monitor course quality and content;(B)verify instructor qualifications and experience;(C)ensure instructor technical competency;(D)conduct instructor background checks;(E)provide regular professional development;(F)implement student safety policies;(G)maintain data privacy and security;(H)enforce a learner code of conduct; and(I)uphold academic integrity standards.(b)In accordance with Subsection (13), the program manager shall allow all authorized online course providers and courses the state board has approved up to July 1, 2024, for the Statewide Online Education Program described in Title 53F, Chapter 4, Part 5, Statewide Online Education Program, to be offered to private school students.(12)The program manager may revoke approval of an authorized online course provider for non-compliance with program requirements described in this section or poor performance as the program manager determines.(13)The program manager shall establish a process for reviewing and approving courses to be offered through the program, including:(a)submission of the following course information:(i)course title;(ii)course fee;(iii)subject area; and(iv)if applicable, credits earned;(b)description of course organization, including:(i)modules, units, or chapters;(ii)frequency of assessments; and(iii)overall course length;(c)course pacing information, including:(i)recommended standard course pace progression;(ii)expected weeks of study per semester of content; and(iii)acknowledgment of a student's flexibility to adjust course pace;(d)course withdrawal policy;(e)final completion deadline for the course;(f)summary description of course subject matter content;(g)course prerequisites, if any;(h)required course materials, including:(i)technology requirements; and(ii)tangible materials needed for course completion;(i)alignment with any applicable:(i)industry standards;(ii)state board standards;(iii)National Collegiate Athletic Association requirements; or(iv)accreditation requirements;(j)method of course instruction and delivery;(k)description of instructional support, including:(i)frequency of instructor-initiated one-on-one progress checks;(ii)frequency of instructor-led tutoring;(iii)availability of small-group tutoring;(iv)frequency of synchronous one-on-one instructor-led checks for a student's understanding; and(v)regular student interaction with educators;(l)student-to-teacher ratio;(m)for blended or hybrid format courses:(i)a description of in-person instruction components; and(ii)any waiver for online instructional support requirements when a student receives real-time in-person instruction for a portion of the course; and(n)prohibiting credit recovery courses or packet-based courses.(14)The program manager shall ensure the review process described in Subsection (13):(a)does not require an authorized online course provider to alter the provider's:(i)creed;(ii)practices;(iii)admissions policies;(iv)hiring practices; or(v)curricula, including any religious course or course content;(b)maintains an authorized online course provider's autonomy while accepting program funds; and(c)provides for a regular renewal of:(i)a course approval; and(ii)an authorized online course provider's authorization based on criteria, including:(A)a course completion rate of at least 80%;(B)reviews of the courses provided by a parent or eligible student; and(C)if applicable, fidelity to the approval criteria described in Subsection (11).(15)An authorized online course provider shall:(a)for each course offered, establish reasonable:(i)course lengths;(ii)standardized completion deadlines that are the same for all courses offered by the provider;(iii)standardized withdrawal deadlines that are the same for all courses offered by the provider; and(iv)course fees;(b)submit the information described in Subsections (13) and (15)(a) to the program manager for approval;(c)ensure the information described in Subsections (13) and (15)(a) are correctly posted with each course listing; and(d)report enrollment and withdrawal data to the program manager within five business days.(16)Subject to legislative appropriation, the program manager shall manage program funds to administer the program, including:(a)paying a course fee to an authorized online course provider as follows:(i)60% of the course fee paid upon an eligible student's enrollment; and(ii)40% of the course fee paid upon the eligible student's completion of the course;(b)if the student does not complete the course by the deadline the authorized online course provider establishes as described in Subsection (15), disqualifying an authorized online course provider from receiving the 40% of the course fee as described in Subsection (16)(a)(ii);(c)processing payments to a provider within 30 days of relevant deadlines for enrollment, withdrawal, or course completion; and(d)establishing a payment structure for payments made to a provider that ensures no transaction fees are passed on to the provider.(17)Subject to legislative appropriation, the Legislature shall:(a)provide funds for the program that are separate from funding for public education programs; and(b)adjust the appropriation based on anticipated enrollment increases in the program.(18)The program manager may use a percentage of the appropriation described in Subsection (17) for administrative costs as follows:(a)up to 8% of the appropriation for administrative costs when the total annual appropriation from the Legislature is $10,000,000 or less; and(b)up to 5% of the appropriation for administrative costs when the total annual appropriation from the Legislature exceeds $10,000,000.(19)The program manager shall provide an annual report to the Education Interim Committee regarding the performance of the program, including:(a)number of students served;(b)courses offered and completed;(c)student progress and completion rates; and(d)financial information and use of funds.(20)The program manager shall establish a comprehensive system for monitoring providers, including:(a)regular performance reviews based on:(i)student completion rates;(ii)student academic progress metrics;(iii)instructor qualifications and performance;(iv)course content quality and alignment; and(v)technical system reliability;(b)annual compliance audits of:(i)financial records;(ii)student data privacy practices; and(iii)security protocols; and(c)regular provider site visits that occur at least once per academic year.(21)On or before July 1, 2025, and as frequently as necessary to maintain the information, the state board shall provide information on the state board's website, including:(a)information on the program manager, including the program manager's contact information; and(b)an overview of the program.(22)In the event of the expiration or termination of a program manager contract, or the inability of a program manager to perform required duties:(a)the Department of Operations shall serve as a temporary bridge program administrator solely during the time required to:(i)maintain essential program operations; and(ii)complete the procurement process for selecting a new program manager;(b)the Department of Operations shall immediately initiate and complete the procurement process described in this section in an expedited manner;(c)the Department of Operations shall establish clear timelines and procedures for the transition process between the previous program manager to the Department of Operations to the new program manager; and(d)the Department of Operations shall provide proper notice to and coordinate with:(i)authorized online course providers;(ii)parents;(iii)the state board; and(iv)other affected parties.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 63I-2-253 is amended to read:63I-2-253Effective 07/01/26. Repeal dates: Titles 53 through 53G.(1)Title 53, Chapter 2c, COVID-19 Health and Economic Response Act, is repealed July 1, 2026.(2)Section 53-22-104.1, School Security Task Force -- Membership -- Duties -- Per diem -- Report -- Expiration, is repealed December 31, 2025.(3)Section 53-22-104.2, The School Security Task Force -- Education Advisory Board, is repealed December 31, 2025.(4)Section 53-25-103, Airport dangerous weapon possession reporting requirements, is repealed December 31, 2031.(5)Subsection 53-25-602(4)(b), regarding the rights of a peace officer placed onto a prosecution agency's Brady identification system before May 7, 2025, is repealed December 1, 2025.(6)Subsection 53-29-302(2)(b)(ii), regarding the requirement for the Department of Corrections to submit the results of risk assessments for sex offenders to the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice, is repealed January 1, 2030.(7)Subsection 53E-3-501(7)(e)(ii), regarding a report on the packet method, is repealed July 1, 2028.(8)Subsection 53F-2-504(6), regarding a report on the Salary Supplement for Highly Needed Educators, is repealed July 1, 2026.(9)Section 53F-4-518, regarding small school student access to courses, is repealed July 1, 2027.(9)(10)Section 53F-5-221, Management of energy and water use pilot program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(10)(11)Section 53F-5-222, Mentoring and Supporting Teacher Excellence and Refinement Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(11)(12)Section 53F-5-223, Stipends for Future Educators Grant Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(13)Title 53F, Chapter 5, Part 5, Personalized, Competency-based Learning Grants Program, is repealed July 1, 2027.(12)(14)Subsection 53G-11-502(1), regarding implementation of the educator evaluation process, is repealed July 1, 2029.(13)(15)Section 53G-11-506, Establishment of educator evaluation program -- Joint committee, is repealed July 1, 2029.(14)(16)Section 53G-11-507, Components of educator evaluation program, is repealed July 1, 2029.(15)(17)Section 53G-11-508, Summative evaluation timelines -- Review of summative evaluations, is repealed July 1, 2029.(16)(18)Section 53G-11-509, Mentor for provisional educator, is repealed July 1, 2029.(17)(19)Section 53G-11-510, State board to describe a framework for the evaluation of educators, is repealed July 1, 2029.(18)(20)Section 53G-11-511, Rulemaking for privacy protection, is repealed July 1, 2029.(19)(21)Subsection 53G-11-520(1), regarding optional alternative educator evaluation processes, is repealed July 1, 2029.(20)(22)Subsection 53G-11-520(2), regarding an exception from educator evaluation process requirements, is repealed July 1, 2029.

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 63J-1-206 is amended to read:63J-1-206Effective 07/01/26. Appropriations governed by chapter -- Restrictions on expenditures -- Transfer of funds -- Exclusion.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsections (1)(b) and (2)(e), or where expressly exempted in the appropriating act:(i)all money appropriated by the Legislature is appropriated upon the terms and conditions set forth in this chapter; and(ii)any department, agency, or institution that accepts money appropriated by the Legislature does so subject to the requirements of this chapter.(b)This section does not apply to:(i)the Legislature and itsthe Legislature's committees; and(ii)the Investigation Account of the Water Resources Construction Fund, which is governed by Section 73-10-8.(2)(a)Each item of appropriation is to be expended subject to any schedule of programs and any restriction attached to the item of appropriation, as designated by the Legislature.(b)Each schedule of programs or restriction attached to an appropriation item:(i)is a restriction or limitation upon the expenditure of the respective appropriation made;(ii)does not itself appropriate any money; and(iii)is not itself an item of appropriation.(c)(i)An appropriation or any surplus of any appropriation may not be diverted from any department, agency, institution, division, or line item to any other department, agency, institution, division, or line item.(ii)If the money appropriated to an agency to pay lease payments under the program established in Section 63A-5b-703 exceeds the amount required for the agency's lease payments to the Division of Facilities Construction and Management, the agency may:(A)transfer money from the lease payments line item to other line items within the agency; and(B)retain and use the excess money for other purposes.(d)The money appropriated subject to a schedule of programs or restriction may be used only for the purposes authorized.(e)In order for a department, agency, or institution to transfer money appropriated to it from one program to another program, the department, agency, or institution shall revise its budget execution plan as provided in Section 63J-1-209.(f)(i)The procedures for transferring money between programs within a line item as provided by Subsection (2)(e) do not apply to money appropriated to the State Board of Education for the Minimum School Program or capital outlay programs created in Title 53F, Chapter 3, State Funding -- Capital Outlay Programs.(ii)The state superintendent may transfer money appropriated for the programs specified in Subsection (2)(f)(i) only as provided by Section 53F-2-205.(3)Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(c)(i):(a)the state superintendent: (i)may transfer money appropriated for: (A)the Minimum School Program between line items in accordance with Section 53F-2-205; and(B)in fiscal years 2027 and 2028, State Board of Education line items to reorganize the administrative office of the State Board of Education to support the state board's strategic plan and increase efficiency of operations related to educator licensing, Minimum School Program administration, policy, communication, oversight, and system standards and accountability;(B)initial enrollment estimates for charter schools between line items in accordance with Section 53F-2-707; and(ii)shall provide the state board with information on the transfers described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) within 60 days of a transfer; and(iii)shall report actions the state superintendent takes under Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B) to:(A)the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee; and(B)the Executive Appropriations Committee;(b)the Utah Board of Higher Education may transfer reinvestment funds, as defined in Section 53H-8-210, to a degree-granting institution, in accordance with the process described in Section 53H-8-210; and(c)the Department of Government Operations may transfer money appropriated to another department, agency, institution, or division for the purpose of paying the costs of pay for performance under Section 63A-17-112.(4)During fiscal years 2026 through 2029, the Utah Board of Higher Education may transfer money from the Utah Board of Higher Education's line item for high-value careers to the operating budgets of institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 53H-1-101, in amounts that are no greater than the amount the Legislature approves.

Section 12:
Section 13.  FY 2026 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2026. Subsection 13(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATION - MINIMUM SCHOOL PROGRAMITEM 1State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Related to Basic School ProgramsFrom Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time(11,125,000)School-Based Education Support Professional Bonus(11,125,000)STATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 2State Board of Education - Educator LicensingThe Legislature intends that the State Board of Education use up to $50,000, appropriated in Senate Bill 2, Item 33 of the 2025 General Session for FY 2026, to support the Utah National Board Certified Coalition for travel to rural districts and other locations, recruitment and mentorship activities, and stipends that assist Utah teachers in obtaining National Board Certification, in accordance with Utah Code Section 63G-6b-201.ITEM 3State Board of Education - Contracted Initiatives and GrantsFrom Income Tax Fund, One-time(3,121,600)Software Licenses for Early Literacy(3,121,600)ITEM 4State Board of Education - Policy, Communication,  OversightFrom Income Tax Fund, One-time150,400From Federal Funds, One-time57,579,600Policy and Communication150,400Student Support Services57,579,600ITEM 5State Board of Education - System Standards  AccountabilityFrom Income Tax Fund, One-time(5,844,900)From Federal Funds, One-time19,739,500Student Achievement(25,000)Teaching and Learning14,467,000Assessment and Accountability(1,024,000)Career and Technical Education539,600Special Education4,219,700Early Literacy Outcomes Improvement(4,282,700)ITEM 6State Board of Education - Utah Schools for the Deaf and the BlindFrom Income Tax Fund, One-time3,861,800From Federal Funds, One-time2,200Support Services10,057,800Administration(10,484,300)Transportation and Support Services(8,222,600)Utah State Instructional Materials Access Center892,200School for the Deaf7,700,300School for the Blind3,920,600ITEM 7State Board of Education - State Board and Administrative OperationsFrom Income Tax Fund, One-time18,318,900Financial Operations18,318,900ITEM 8State Board of Education - Utah Fits All Scholarship ProgramFrom Income Tax Fund, One-time49,600Student Scholarships and Administration49,600Subsection 13(b).Restricted Fund and Account TransfersThe Legislature authorizes the State Division of Finance to transfer the following amounts between the following funds or accounts as indicated. Expenditures and outlays from the funds to which the money is transferred must be authorized by an appropriation.PUBLIC EDUCATIONITEM 9Income Tax Fund Restricted - Utah Fits All Scholarship Program Restricted AccountFrom Income Tax Fund, One-time(49,600)Utah Fits All Scholarship Program Restricted Account(49,600)

Section 13:
Section 14.  FY 2027 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2027. Subsection 14(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSTATE BOARD OF EDUCATION - MINIMUM SCHOOL PROGRAMITEM 10State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Basic School ProgramFrom Uniform School Fund27,172,200Necessarily Existent Small Schools (480 WPUs)2,339,000Career and Technical Education - Add-on (-2,806 WPUs)(13,666,700)Students At-Risk Add-on (5,099 WPUs)24,833,200College and Career Counseling (2,806 WPUs)13,666,700ITEM 11State Board of Education - Minimum School Program - Related to Basic School ProgramsFrom Uniform School Fund(31,252,400)From Uniform School Fund, One-time(19,768,900)From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time22,768,900Pupil Transportation To  From School(6,500,000)Adult Education(300,000)Educator Salary Adjustments(4,800,000)Salary Supplement for Highly Needed Educators(2,000,000)Digital Teaching and Learning Program(18,352,400)Student Health and Counseling Support Program(1,300,000)Grow Your Own Teacher and Counselor Pipeline5,000,000STATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONITEM 12State Board of Education - Child Nutrition ProgramsFrom Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time2,516,900Child Nutrition2,516,900ITEM 13State Board of Education - Educator LicensingFrom Income Tax Fund(1,496,300)From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time3,600,000STEM Endorsement Incentives2,400,000National Board-Certified Teachers(296,300)ITEM 14State Board of Education - Fine Arts OutreachFrom Income Tax Fund(54,000)Subsidy Program(54,000)In accordance with Title 63G Chapter 6b, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education provide direct award grants totaling $6,121,000 in fiscal year 2027, as appropriated in House Bill 1, Item 37 of the 2026 General Session, to the following direct award grant recipients for the Fine Arts Outreach - Professional Outreach Programs in the Schools (POPS):(1) $727,000 to Ballet West;(2) $225,000 to the Nora Eccles Harrison Museum of Art;(3) $159,000 to Plan-B Theatre;(4) $342,700 to Repertory Dance Theatre;(5) $289,500 to Ririe-Woodbury Dance Company;(6) $359,900 to the Springville Museum of Art;(7) $271,900 to Spy Hop;(8) $458,100 to Tanner Dance;(9) $387,800 to the Utah Festival Opera and Musical Theatre;(10) $233,900 to the Utah Film Center;(11) $216,000 to the Utah Museum of Contemporary Art;(12) $209,900 to the Utah Museum of Fine Art;(13) $449,000 to the Utah Opera;(14) $447,600 to the Utah Shakespeare Festival; and(15) $1,343,000 to the Utah Symphony.ITEM 15State Board of Education - Contracted Initiatives and GrantsFrom General Fund(2,500)From Income Tax Fund(2,138,900)From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time7,400,000From Revenue Transfers12,500Contracts and Grants3,300,000UPSTART(45,100)Supplemental Educational Improvement Matching Grants(2,700)Competency-Based Education Grants(2,081,100)Utah Anti-Bullying Coalition300,000Student Credential Account3,800,000In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 6b, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education provide direct award grants totaling $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 to the direct award grant recipient, Junior Achievement, for the 3DE by Junior Achievement program.The Legislature intends that the Division of Finance transfer any remaining closing nonlapsing balances from Fiscal Year 2026 in the Contracted Initiatives and Grants line item to the Fiscal Year 2027 beginning nonlapsing balances of the Statewide Technology Contracts line item for the following programs: Computer Science Initiative; Education Technology Management System; IT Academy; School Data Collection and Analysis; and Software Licenses for Early Literacy.In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 6b, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education provide direct award grants totaling $3,800,000 in fiscal year 2027 to the direct award grant recipient, YouScience LLC, for the Student Credential Account (SCA) Statewide Usage program.ITEM 16State Board of Education - MSP Categorical Program AdministrationFrom Income Tax Fund(899,400)From Revenue Transfers57,700Digital Teaching and Learning(541,700)Early Learning Training and Assessment(300,000)ITEM 17State Board of Education - Science OutreachFrom Income Tax Fund(598,100)Informal Science Education Enhancement(598,100)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 6b, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education provide direct award grants totaling $5,666,900 in fiscal year 2027, as appropriated in House Bill 1, Item 41 of the 2026 General Session, to the following direct award grant recipients for the Science Outreach Informal Education Enhancement (iSEE) program:(1) $1,052,600 to the Clark Planetarium;(2) $715,600 to Discovery Gateway;(3) $119,600 to Hawkwatch International;(4) $807,400 to Loveland Living Planet Aquarium;(5) $866,800 to the Natural History Museum of Utah;(6) $245,300 to the Ogden Nature Center;(7) $355,800 to Red Butte Gardens; (8) $897,200 to Thanksgiving Point;(9) $381,600 to Utah's Hogle Zoo; and(10) $225,000 to Utah State University Extension.ITEM 18State Board of Education - Policy, Communication,  OversightFrom Income Tax Fund(828,900)From Federal Funds57,579,600Policy and Communication100,100Student Support Services57,575,600School Turnaround and Leadership Development Act(1,000,000)Suicide Prevention75,000ITEM 19State Board of Education - System Standards  AccountabilityFrom Income Tax Fund399,300From Income Tax Fund, One-time(1,035,000)From Federal Funds19,739,500From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time35,000,000Student Achievement(25,000)Teaching and Learning14,739,000Assessment and Accountability(257,800)Career and Technical Education427,900Special Education4,219,700CTE Catalyst Center35,000,000ITEM 20State Board of Education - State Charter School BoardFrom Income Tax Fund, One-time(200,000)Statewide Charter School Training Programs(200,000)ITEM 21State Board of Education - Utah Schools for the Deaf and the BlindFrom Income Tax Fund5,486,000From Federal Funds2,200From Revenue Transfers(4,935,000)Support Services9,973,400Administration(15,360,100)Transportation and Support Services(6,573,200)Utah State Instructional Materials Access Center892,200School for the Deaf7,700,300School for the Blind3,920,600Pursuant to appropriations made in Item 45 of House Bill 1, Public Education Budget Amendments (2025 General Session), the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education study the development of a fee-for-service plan that recovers all costs for outreach services the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind provides from a student's local education agency and report to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee by August 15, 2027.Pursuant to appropriations made in Item 45 of House Bill 1, Public Education Budget Amendments (2025 General Session), the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education review rules governing how weighted pupil units are generated by students served through Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind extension classrooms, evaluate local education agency data submissions to determine compliance, and study how to remit Special Education Add-on weighted pupil units to the USDB for impacted students and report to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee by August 15, 2027.ITEM 22State Board of Education - Statewide Online Education Program SubsidyFrom Income Tax Fund(2,339,000)From Income Tax Fund, One-time(328,700)From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account2,339,000Statewide Online Education Program(328,700)ITEM 23State Board of Education - State Board and Administrative OperationsFrom Income Tax Fund1,064,000From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time1,000,000From School and Institutional Trust Fund Management Acct.(167,100)From Trust Distribution Account167,100Financial Operations1,064,000School Trust167,100Board and Administration832,900The Legislature intends that the State Board of Education use up to $1,000,000 one-time appropriated from the Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account in FY 2027 to study education technology in the schools by conducting an inventory and needs assessment of the various software programs public schools use to support student learning, including programs contracted at the state and local levels for use in the public schools and intended use and outcomes of the various products. The Legislature further intends that the State Board of Education study the use of AI tools to provide students, teachers, and parents with continuous, real-time, identification of student educational outcomes and needs through existing state data systems, identify duplicative technologies and associated cost savings to the state and local education agencies through discontinuation, and report to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee by October 15, 2028.ITEM 24State Board of Education - Utah Fits All Scholarship ProgramFrom Income Tax Fund49,600Student Scholarships and Administration49,600ITEM 25State Board of Education - Statewide Technology ContractsFrom Income Tax Fund(8,831,400)From Income Tax Fund, One-time(244,100)From Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time12,910,200Computer Science Initiative(244,100)Education Technology Management System1,900,000Elementary Reading Assessment Software(100,000)School Data Collection  Analysis3,600,000Software Licenses for Early Literacy(10,631,400)One-time Technology Contracts9,310,200In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 6b, the Legislature intends that the State Board of Education provide direct award grants totaling $1,400,000 in fiscal year 2027 to the direct award grant recipient, Scrible, for the Research, Writing, and Responsible AI Solution program.Subsection 14(b).Restricted Fund and Account TransfersThe Legislature authorizes the State Division of Finance to transfer the following amounts between the following funds or accounts as indicated. Expenditures and outlays from the funds to which the money is transferred must be authorized by an appropriation.PUBLIC EDUCATIONITEM 26Income Tax Fund Restricted - Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted AccountFrom Uniform School Fund(42,833,600)Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account(42,833,600)ITEM 27Income Tax Fund Restricted - Utah Fits All Scholarship Program Restricted AccountFrom Income Tax Fund(49,600)Utah Fits All Scholarship Program Restricted Account(49,600)Subsection 14(c).Fiduciary FundsThe Legislature has reviewed proposed revenues, expenditures, fund balances, and changes in fund balances for the following fiduciary funds.PUBLIC EDUCATIONSCHOOL AND INSTITUTIONAL TRUST FUND OFFICEITEM 28School and Institutional Trust Fund Office - School for the Blind TrustFrom Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, One-time4,800,000Permanent Fund - School for the Blind Trust4,800,000

Section 14:
Section 15.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect July 1, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 13, FY 2026 Appropriations (Effective upon final passage) take effect:(a)except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), May 6, 2026; or(b)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house:(i)upon approval by the governor;(ii)without the governor's signature, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(iii)in the case of a veto, the date of veto override.